Hawaii, session 2026, HB1905.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii has a rich seafaring history beginning with the voyaging settlers of the islands.  Throughout history, the fair-weather ports of the islands have welcomed trade, seafaring workers, and travelers.  Today, the maritime industry plays a vital role in the State's economy and culture.  Maritime operations at state harbors transport a majority of all the State's basic necessities including food, clothing, construction materials, fuel, and other essential supplies. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish May 22 of each year as Maritime Day to preserve Hawaii's maritime history and celebrate the contributions of port operations and maritime workers to Hawaii's economy and culture. SECTION 2.  Chapter 8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§8-     Maritime Day.  May 22 of each year shall be known and designated as "Maritime Day" to preserve Hawaii's maritime history and celebrate the importance of the maritime industry to the State's economy and culture.  This day is not and shall not be construed to be a state holiday." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________